Utah statutes.
78B-1-151.   Witnesses -- Expenses for expert witnesses.
(1)  The court may appoint any expert witness agreed upon by the parties or of
its own selection.  The court shall inform the expert of required duties in
writing and a copy shall be filed with the court record.
(2)  The appointed expert shall advise the court and the parties of findings
and may be called to testify by the court or by any party.   The expert
witness is subject to cross-examination by each party.
(3)  The court shall determine the reasonable compensation of the expert and
order payment.  The parties may call expert witnesses of their own at their
own expense.  Upon a showing that a defendant is financially unable to pay the
compensation of an expert whose services are necessary for an adequate
defense, the compensation shall be paid as if  the expert were called on
behalf of the prosecution.
(4)  Payment by the court for an expert witness in a criminal case is limited
to the fee and mileage allowance for witnesses under Section 78B-1-119 and
necessary meals and lodging expenses as provided by rule of the Judicial
Council.  Compensation of an expert witness beyond the statutory fee and
mileage allowance shall be paid by the parties under Subsection (3).
